Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-136
Paving petitions; power to sign.

Wherever any paving district is created adjacent to any state institution or the Nebraska State Fairgrounds, the chief executive officer in charge of the state institution or the chairperson of the Nebraska State Fair Board for the fairgrounds is authorized to sign petitions, in the name of the state, to create paving districts.

Laws 1919, c. 215, § 1, p. 926;

C.S.1922, § 6861;

C.S.1929, § 83-132;

R.S.1943, § 83-136;

Laws 2002, LB 1236, § 20.

County commissioners are authorized to count the state's property as favoring the improvement when a petition is signed by the officers having charge of state institutions. Brown Real Estate Co. v. Lancaster County, 108 Neb. 514, 188 N.W. 247 (1922).